Utah statutes.
46-1-7.   Disqualifications.

A notary may not perform a notarial act if the notary:

(1)  is a signer of the document that is to be notarized except in case of a self-proved will as provided in Section 75-2-504; or

(2)  is named in the document that is to be notarized except:

(a)  in the case of a self-proved will as provided in Section 75-2-504; or

(b)  in the case of a licensed attorney that is listed in the document only as representing a signer or another person named in the document;

(3)  will receive directly from a transaction connected with a financial transaction in which the notary is named individually as a principal; or

(4)  will receive directly from a real property transaction in which the notary is named individually as a grantor, grantee, mortgagor, mortgagee, trustor, trustee, beneficiary, vendor, vendee, lessor, or lessee.

